Maryland, session 2025, HB1137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–718.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RED LINE” MEANS A RAIL TRANSIT FACILITY USING
ONE OR MORE VEHICLES OPERATING IN TANDEM ON A FIXED RAIL IN A
COMBINATION OF AT–GRADE, ELEVATED, AND UNDERGROUND CONFIGURATIONS
THROUGH BALTIMORE CITY AND BALTIMORE COUNTY ALONG A GENERALLY
EAST–TO–WEST ALIGNMENT BETWEEN THE TERMINUS OF SECURITY BOULEVARD
ON THE WEST AND THE JOHNS HOPKINS BAYVIEW MEDICAL CENTER ON THE EAST,
CONNECTING AS APPROPRIATE TO OTHER FIXED–ROUTE TRANSIT SERVICES.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1137*

HOUSE BILL 1137
(B) IN CONDUCTING THE RED LINE TRANSIT PROJECT, THE
ADMINISTRATION MAY NOT ACQUIRE ANY REAL PROPERTY FOR PLANNING,
CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, OR MAINTENANCE OF THE RED LINE IF THE
ACQUISITION WOULD RESULT IN INVOLUNTARY RESIDENTIAL DISPLACEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.